Washington statutes.
RCW 11.125.180

Agent resignation—Procedure.

Unless the power of attorney has been terminated in accordance with RCW 11.125.080, or the power of attorney provides a different method for an agent's resignation, an agent may resign by giving notice to the principal and, if the principal is incapacitated:

(1) To the conservator or guardian, if one has been appointed for the principal, and a coagent or successor agent, if designated; or

(2) If there is no person described in subsection (1) of this section:

(a) To any person reasonably believed by the agent to have sufficient interest in the principal's welfare;

(b) To a governmental agency having authority to protect the welfare of the principal; or

(c) By filing notice with the county recorder's office in the county where the principal resides.

[ 2016 c 209 s 118.]